src/interjection-smj-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

! Interjections
! =============

LEXICON INTERJ
+Interj:%> # ;

LEXICON Interjection
halleluja INTERJ ;
hosianna INTERJ ;
 amen    INTERJ ; ! Well, XXX
æææ INTERJ ;
hå INTERJ ;
håj INTERJ ;
há INTERJ ;
ge INTERJ ;
håhåj INTERJ ;
eloi INTERJ ;
fuoj INTERJ ;
fij INTERJ ;
fijdejga INTERJ ;
jiekkur INTERJ ;
dejga INTERJ ;
lema INTERJ ;
fissj INTERJ ;
sabaktani INTERJ ;
koum INTERJ ;
jiesstánam INTERJ ;
hærrá#jiesstánam INTERJ ;
hærrá#jiesstás INTERJ ;
jiemmilam INTERJ ;
hærrá#jiemmilam INTERJ ;
hello INTERJ ;
vuoj INTERJ ;
vuoj-vuoj  INTERJ ;
dale    INTERJ ;
dehe INTERJ ;
ånu INTERJ ;
ah:ah INTERJ ;
huh:huh INTERJ ;
åhå INTERJ ;
aha INTERJ ;
hurráh:hurráh INTERJ ;
